Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2022.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5846XS (1) 91 sb/js S.F. 2022 Section 1. Section 34A.7A, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. (1) The director shall adopt by rule a monthly 3 surcharge of one dollar and fifteen cents, subject to 4 adjustment pursuant to subparagraph (2), to be imposed on 5 each originating service number provided in this state. The 6 surcharge shall be imposed uniformly on a statewide basis 7 and simultaneously on all originating service numbers as 8 provided by rule of the director. The surcharge shall not be 9 imposed on wire-line-based communications or prepaid wireless 10 telecommunications service. 11 (2) Each year beginning July 1, 2027, the director shall 12 adopt by rule a two percent increase to the monthly surcharge, 13 rounded to the next highest full cent, to be effective July 1 14 of each calendar year. The newly increased monthly surcharge 15 amount shall be imposed uniformly on a statewide basis and 16 simultaneously on all originating service numbers as provided 17 by rule of the director. 18 Sec. 2. Section 34A.7A, subsection 2, paragraph b, 19 subparagraph (2), unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended 20 to read as follows: 21 The amount allocated under this paragraph âbâ shall be 22 sixty percent of the total amount of surcharge generated per 23 calendar quarter , unless otherwise provided. The amount shall 24 be allocated as follows: 25 Sec. 3. Section 34A.7A, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 26 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 27 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (4) The amount allocated under this 28 paragraph âbâ shall be fifty-five percent of the total amount of 29 surcharge generated per calendar quarter through June 30, 2028. 30 This subparagraph is repealed July 1, 2028, or upon completion 31 of phase 1 and phase 2 of the next generation 911 transition 32 as described in 47 C.F.R. pt. 9, subpt. J, whichever occurs 33 first. The department shall notify the Iowa Code editor upon 34 the completion of the next generation 911 transition. 35 -1- LSB 5846XS (1) 91 sb/js 1/ 2 S.F. 2022 Sec. 4. REPEAL. Section 34A.12, Code 2026, is repealed. 1